pt-PT: Tipo de cabelo: Encaracolado; Seco; Normal; Liso; Ondulado; Outro
zh-TW: 髮型: 捲曲; 乾式; 中性; 直; 波浪式; 其他
da: Hårtype: Krøllet; Tør; Normalt; Lige; Bølget; Andet
el: Τύπος μαλλιών: Κατσαρά; Ξηρό κούρδισμα; Κανονικός; Ευθεία; Κυματιστά; Άλλο
th: ประเภทผม: ผมหยิก; ไม่หวาน; ผิวปกติ; ผมตรง; แบบลอน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de cabelo: Encaracolado; Seco; Normal; Liso; Ondulado; Outro
de: Haartyp: Lockig; Trocken; Normal; Glatt; Wellig; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип коса: Къдрава; Суха; Нормална; Права; Вълниста; Други
cs: Typ vlasů: Kudrnaté; Suché; Normální; Rovné; Vlnité; Jiné
zh-CN: 头发类型: 卷曲; 干; 普通; 直; 波浪滑道; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta las: Kodrasti; Suhi; Normalni; Ravni; Valoviti; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip păr: Creț; Uscat; Normal; Drept; Ondulat; Altele
lt-LT: Plaukų tipas: Garbanoti; Sausas; Normalūs; Tiesūs; Banguoti; Kita
it: Tipo di capelli: Ricci; Secco; Normale; Dritto; Mossi; Altro
pl: Typ włosów: Kręcone; Sucha; Normalny; Prosta; Falista; Inne
ko: 헤어 유형: 곱슬; 드라이; 일반; 일자형; 웨이브; 기타
nb: Hårtype: Krøllete; Tørr; Normal; Rett; Bølgete; Annet
ja: 髪質: 縮れ毛; ドライ; 普通; ストレート; ウェーブのかかった; その他
en: Hair type: Curly; Dry; Normal; Straight; Wavy; Other
hr-HR: Tip kose: Kovrčava; Suha; Normalna; Ravna; Valovita; Ostalo
vi: Kiêu tóc: Tóc xoăn; Không ngọt; Da thường; Tóc thẳng; Tóc xoăn gợn sóng; Khác
sv: Hårtyp: Lockigt; Torrt; Normalt; Rakt; Vågigt; Övrigt
es: Tipo de cabello: Ondulado; Seco; Normal; Liso; Ondulado; Otros
hu: Haj típusa: Göndör; Száraz; Normál; Egyenes; Hullámos; Egyéb
fi: Hiustyyppi: Kiharat; Kuiva; Normaali; Suorat; Aaltoilevat; Muu
sk-SK: Typ vlasov: Kučeravý; Suchý; Normálny; Rovný; Vlnitý; Iné
ru: Тип волос: Кудрявые; Сухие; Нормальные; Прямые; Волнистые; Другое
tr: Saç tipi: Kıvırcık; Sek; Normal; Düz; Dalgalı; Diğer
fr: Type de cheveux: Bouclés; Sec; Normale; Lisses; Ondulé; Autre
nl: Haartype: Krullend; Droog; Normaal; Steil; Golf; Andere